Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB270.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 18.1. A person may not sell or offer to sell human milk over the Internet to another person directly or through a classified advertisement.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.1234567891011121314151617